Illinois, session 104th, HB1085.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)7    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 8including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 9of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 10coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 11benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 12health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 13under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 14356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 15356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 16356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 17356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 18356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 19356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 20356z.74, and 356z.77 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 21coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, 22and 370c, and 370c.4 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 23Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this   HB1085 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 2provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of 3the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, 4Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 5rule county to which this Section applies must comply with 6every provision of this Section. 7    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 8any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 9with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 10Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 11Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 12whatever reason, is unauthorized. 13(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 14102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 151-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 16eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 17102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 181-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 19eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 20103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 217-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 22eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 23revised 11-26-24.) 24    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 25changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows:   HB1085 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)2    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a 3municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 4self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 5coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 6coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 7covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 8Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 9356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 10356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 11356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 12356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 13356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 14356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 15356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, and 16356z.77 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 17comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c, and 18370c.4 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of 19Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section. The 20requirement that health benefits be covered as provided in 21this is an exclusive power and function of the State and is a 22denial and limitation under Article VII, Section 6, subsection 23(h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home rule municipality to 24which this Section applies must comply with every provision of 25this Section.   HB1085 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 2any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 3with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 4Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 5Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 6whatever reason, is unauthorized. 7(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 8102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 91-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 10eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 11102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 121-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 13eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 14103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 157-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 16eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 17revised 11-26-24.) 18    Section 15. The School Code is amended by changing Section 1910-22.3f as follows: 20    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)21    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 22protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 23post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 24policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and   HB1085 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 2356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 3356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 4356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 5356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 6356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 7356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 8356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 9Insurance policies shall comply with Section 356z.19 of the 10Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall comply with 11Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c, and 370c.4 of the Illinois 12Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 13requirements of this Section. 14    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 15any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 16with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 17Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 18Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 19whatever reason, is unauthorized. 20(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 21102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 221-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, 23eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 24102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 251-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, 26eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23;   HB1085 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 27-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, 3eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 4    Section 20. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 370c.4 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/370c.4 new)7    Sec. 370c.4. Mental health and substance use parity.8    (a) In this Section:9    "Application" means a person's or facility's application 10to become a participating provider with an insurer in at least 11one of the insurer's provider networks.12    "Applying provider" means a provider or facility that has 13submitted a completed application to become a participating 14provider or facility with an insurer.15    "Behavioral health trainee" means any person: (1) engaged 16in the provision of mental health or substance use disorder 17clinical services as part of that person's supervised course 18of study while enrolled in a master's or doctoral psychology, 19social work, counseling, or marriage or family therapy program 20or as a postdoctoral graduate working toward licensure; and 21(2) who is working toward clinical State licensure under the 22clinical supervision of a fully licensed mental health or 23substance use disorder treatment provider.24    "Completed application" means a person's or facility's   HB1085 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1application to become a participating provider that has been 2submitted to the insurer and includes all the required 3information for the application to be considered by the 4insurer according to the insurer's policies and procedures for 5verifying a provider's or facility's credentials.6    "Contracting process" means the process by which a mental 7health or substance use disorder treatment provider or 8facility makes a completed application with an insurer to 9become a participating provider with the insurer until the 10effective date of a final contract between the provider or 11facility and the insurer. "Contracting process" includes the 12process of verifying a provider's credentials.13    "Participating provider" means any mental health or 14substance use disorder treatment provider that has a contract 15to provide mental health or substance use disorder services 16with an insurer.17    (b) Consistent with the principles of the federal Mental 18Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008, and for the 19purposes of strengthening network adequacy for mental health 20and substance use disorder services and lowering 21out-of-network utilization, provider reimbursement rates 22subject to this Section shall comply with the reimbursement 23rate floors for all in-network mental health and substance use 24disorder services, including inpatient services, outpatient 25services, office visits, and residential care, delivered by 26Illinois providers and facilities using the Illinois data in   HB1085 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1the Research Triangle Institute International's study, 2Behavioral Health Parity - Pervasive Disparities in Access to 3In-Network Care Continue, Mark, T.L., & Parish, W. (April 42024). The reimbursement rate floors for in-network mental 5health and substance use disorder services requires that 6reimbursement for each service, classified by Healthcare 7Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCS) codes, Current 8Procedural Terminology (CPT) codes, Ambulatory Payment 9Classifications (APC), Enhanced Ambulatory Patient Groups 10(EAPG), Medicare Severity Diagnosis Related Groups (MS-DRG), 11All Patient Refined Diagnosis Related Groups (APR-DRG), and 12base payment rates with adjusters and applicable outliers must 13be equal to or greater than the dollar amounts applicable 14under this subsection on the date of service for the 15geographic location. The reimbursement rate floor for each 16Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCS) code, 17Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) code, Ambulatory Payment 18Classification (APC), Enhanced Ambulatory Patient Group 19(EAPG), Medicare Severity Diagnosis Related Group (MS-DRG), 20All Patient Refined Diagnosis Related Group (APR-DRG), and 21base payment rate with adjusters and applicable outliers shall 22apply to all group or individual policies of accident and 23health insurance or managed care plans that are amended, 24delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, or 25any contracted third party administering the behavioral health 26benefits for the insurer.  HB1085 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1        (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, 2    the reimbursement rate floor for each Healthcare Common 3    Procedure Coding System (HCPCS) code, Current Procedural 4    Terminology (CPT) code, Ambulatory Payment Classification 5    (APC), Enhanced Ambulatory Patient Group (EAPG), Medicare 6    Severity Diagnosis Related Group (MS-DRG), All Patient 7    Refined Diagnosis Related Group (APR-DRG), and base 8    payment rate with adjusters and applicable outliers for a 9    mental health or substance use disorder service shall be 10    equal to the following dollar amount:11            (A)(i) the average reimbursement percentage for 12        Illinois All Medical/Surgical Clinicians, as listed on 13        the first line of Appendix C-13, page C-52 of the 14        Research Triangle Institute International study, plus;15                (ii) half of the difference between the 16            average reimbursement percentage and the 17            percentage at the 75th percentile for Illinois All 18            Medical/Surgical Clinicians, as listed in the 19            first line in Appendix C-13, page C-52, multiplied 20            by;21            (B) the same source of the benchmark rate that was 22        used to calculate the percentages in items (i) and 23        (ii) of subparagraph (A), using the updated benchmark 24        rate for medical/surgical clinicians for the same 25        Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCS) or 26        Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) code in effect on   HB1085 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1        the date of service for the geographic location, 2        except that:3                (i) the source of the benchmark rate for a 4            hospital inpatient service shall follow the 5            formula set out by the same federal health care 6            program for the acute inpatient operating 7            prospective payment system in effect on the date 8            of service for the geographic location using all 9            applicable adjusters and outliers; and10                (ii) the source of the benchmark rate for a 11            hospital outpatient service shall follow the 12            formula set out by the same federal health care 13            program for the hospital outpatient services 14            prospective payment system in effect on the date 15            of service for the geographic location using all 16            applicable adjusters and outliers.17            Calculation of the benchmark rate shall adhere to 18        the methodologies used in the Research Triangle 19        Institution International study using comparable 20        benefits within the same classification.21        (2) If the rate benchmark set by this subsection is 22    tied to a federal health care program, a rate floor dollar 23    amount shall take effect on the date the federal health 24    care program's benchmark rate takes effect. However, for 25    any year that the benchmark rate decreases for any 26    Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System (HCPCS) code,   HB1085 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1    Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) code, Ambulatory 2    Payment Classification (APC), Enhanced Ambulatory Patient 3    Group (EAPG), Medicare Severity Diagnosis Related Group 4    (MS-DRG), All Patient Refined Diagnosis Related Group 5    (APR-DRG), and base payment rate with adjusters and 6    applicable outliers, the reimbursement rate floor for the 7    purposes of this Section shall remain at the level it was 8    the previous year. Notwithstanding any other provision of 9    this Section, all rate floor dollar amounts in effect on 10    January 1, 2027 shall be equal to the amount described in 11    paragraph (1). The Department has the authority to enforce 12    and monitor the reimbursement rate floor set pursuant to 13    this Section.14    (c) A group or individual policy of accident and health 15insurance or managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 16issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, or any 17contracted third party administering the behavioral health 18benefits for the insurer, shall cover all medically necessary 19mental health or substance use disorder services received by 20the same insured on the same day from the same or different 21mental health or substance use provider or facility for both 22outpatient and inpatient care.23    (d) A group or individual policy of accident and health 24insurance or managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 25issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, or any 26contracted third party administering the behavioral health   HB1085 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1benefits for the insurer, shall cover any medically necessary 2mental health or substance use disorder service provided by a 3behavioral health trainee when the trainee is working toward 4clinical State licensure and is under the supervision of a 5fully licensed mental health or substance use disorder 6treatment provider who is a physician licensed to practice 7medicine in all its branches, licensed clinical psychologist, 8licensed clinical social worker, licensed clinical 9professional counselor, licensed marriage and family 10therapist, licensed speech-language pathologist, or other 11licensed or certified professional at a program licensed 12pursuant to the Substance Use Disorder Act who is engaged in 13treating mental, emotional, nervous, or substance use 14disorders or conditions. Services provided by the trainee must 15be billed under the supervising clinician's rendering National 16Provider Identifier.17    (e) A group or individual policy of accident and health 18insurance or managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 19issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, or any 20contracted third party administering the behavioral health 21benefits for the insurer, shall:22        (1) cover medically necessary 60-minute psychotherapy 23    billed using the Current Procedural Terminology Code 90837 24    for Individual Therapy;25        (2) not impose more onerous documentation requirements 26    on the provider than is required for other psychotherapy   HB1085 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1    Current Procedural Terminology (CPT) codes; and2        (3) not audit the use of Current Procedural 3    Terminology Code 90837 any more frequently than audits for 4    the use of other psychotherapy Current Procedural 5    Terminology (CPT) codes.6    (f)(1) Any group or individual policy of accident and 7health insurance or managed care plan that is amended, 8delivered, issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, or 9any contracted third party administering the behavioral health 10benefits for the insurer, shall complete the contracting 11process with a mental health or substance use disorder 12treatment provider or facility for becoming a participating 13provider in the insurer's network, including the verification 14of the provider's credentials, within 60 days from the date of 15a completed application to the insurer to become a 16participating provider. Nothing in this paragraph (1), 17however, presumes or establishes a contract between an insurer 18and a provider.19    (2) Any group or individual policy of accident and health 20insurance or managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 21issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, or any 22contracted third party administering the behavioral health 23benefits for the insurer, shall reimburse a participating 24mental health or substance use disorder treatment provider or 25facility at the contracted reimbursement rate for any 26medically necessary services provided to an insured from the   HB1085 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1date of submission of the provider's or facility's completed 2application to become a participating provider with the 3insurer up to the effective date of the provider's contract. 4The provider's claims for such services shall be reimbursed 5only when submitted after the effective date of the provider's 6contract with the insurer. This paragraph (2) does not apply 7to a provider that does not have a completed contract with an 8insurer. If a provider opts to submit claims for medically 9necessary mental health or substance use disorder services 10pursuant to this paragraph (2), the provider must notify the 11insured following submission of the claims to the insurer that 12the services provided to the insured may be treated as 13in-network services.14    (3) Any group or individual policy of accident and health 15insurance or managed care plan that is amended, delivered, 16issued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, or any 17contracted third party administering the behavioral health 18benefits for the insurer, shall cover any medically necessary 19mental health or substance use disorder service provided by a 20fully licensed mental health or substance use disorder 21treatment provider affiliated with a mental health or 22substance use disorder treatment group practice who has 23submitted a completed application to become a participating 24provider with an insurer who is delivering services under the 25supervision of another fully licensed participating mental 26health or substance use disorder treatment provider within the   HB1085 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1same group practice up to the effective date of the applying 2provider's contract with the insurer as a participating 3provider. Services provided by the applying provider must be 4billed under the supervising licensed provider's rendering 5National Provider Identifier.6    (4) Upon request, an insurer, or any contracted third 7party administering the behavioral health benefits for the 8insurer, shall provide an applying provider with the insurer's 9credentialing policies and procedures. An insurer, or any 10contracted third party administering the behavioral health 11benefits for the insurer, shall post the following 12nonproprietary information on its website and make that 13information available to all applicants:14        (A) a list of the information required to be included 15    in an application;16        (B) a checklist of the materials that must be 17    submitted in the credentialing process; and18        (C) designated contact information of a network 19    representative, including a designated point of contact, 20    an email address, and a telephone number, to which an 21    applicant may address any credentialing inquiries. 22    (g) The Department has the same authority to enforce this 23Section as it has to enforce compliance with Sections 370c and 24370c.1. Additionally, if the Department determines that an 25insurer or any contracted third party administering the 26behavioral health benefits for the insurer has violated this   HB1085 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1Section, the Department shall, after appropriate notice and 2opportunity for hearing in accordance with Section 402, by 3order assess a civil penalty of $1,000 for each violation. The 4Department shall establish any processes or procedures 5necessary to monitor compliance with this Section. 6    (h) At the end of 2 years, 7 years, and 12 years following 7the implementation of subsection (b) of this Section, the 8Department shall review the impact of this Section on network 9adequacy for mental health and substance use disorder 10treatment and access to affordable mental health and substance 11use care. By no later than December 31, 2030, December 31, 122035, and December 31, 2040, the Department shall submit a 13report in each of those years to the General Assembly that 14includes its analyses and findings. For the purpose of 15evaluating trends in network adequacy, the Department is 16granted the authority to examine out-of-network utilization 17and out-of-pocket costs for insureds for mental health and 18substance use disorder treatment and services for all plans to 19compare with in-network utilization for purposes of evaluating 20access to care. The Department shall conduct an analysis of 21the impact, if any, of the reimbursement rate floor for mental 22health and substance use disorder services on health insurance 23premiums across the State-regulated health insurance markets, 24taking into consideration the need to expand network adequacy 25to improve access to care. 26    (i) The Department of Insurance shall adopt any rules   HB1085 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 05991 BAB 16024 b1necessary to implement this Section by no later than September 21, 2026.3    (j) This Section does not apply to a health care plan 4serving Medicaid populations that provides, arranges for, pays 5for, or reimburses the cost of any health care service for 6persons who are enrolled under the Illinois Public Aid Code or 7under the Children's Health Insurance Program Act.  8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect June 1, 92026.